New York, session 2025-2026, S7909.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 63 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended to read as follows: 3 5. Not more than [one license] two licenses shall be granted to any 4 person under this section. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13008-01-5